Utah statutes.
70A-9a-605.   Unknown debtor or secondary obligor.

A secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as secured party:

(1)  to a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

(a)  that the person is a debtor or obligor;

(b)  the identity of the person; and

(c)  how to communicate with the person; or

(2)  to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

(a)  that the person is a debtor; and

(b)  the identity of the person.

